District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.10

AccessRx Fund.

(a)

The AccessRx Fund is established as a nonlapsing, dedicated fund, into which shall be deposited revenue from manufacturers and labelers that pay rebates pursuant to this subchapter and any appropriations or allocations designated for the AccessRx Fund, along with accruing interest, to be used for the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

All funds in the AccessRx Fund, including any surplus or interest, shall be used to:

(1)

Reimburse retail pharmacies for discounted prices provided to uninsured qualified residents pursuant to § 48-831.33;

(2)

Pay benefits described in § 48-831.23; and

(3)

Reimburse the Department for contracted services, including pharmacy claims processing fees, administrative and associated computer costs, and other reasonable program costs.

(c)

The funds deposited in the AccessRx Fund shall not revert to the General Fund but shall continually be available for the uses designated in subsection (b) of this section, subject to authorization by Congress in an appropriations act.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 110, 51 DCR 3688
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 88(a), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (b)(1), validated a previously made technical correction.
This section is referenced in § 48-831.04.